test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_IHL_STEM_2.gt-norm.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_IHL_STEM_2 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_IHL_STEM_2

     hlgihl+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hlgílga
     hlgihl+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgílgang
     hlgihl+V+DIRECT+PAST: hlgílgan
     hlgihl+V+NON_FACTIVE: hlgíl.ang
     hlgihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hlgílgang
     hlgihl+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hlgílganggang
     hlgihl+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: hlgílgangang
     hlgihl+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgílgiinii
     hlgihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgílgaangaa
     hlgihl+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgílgaangaan
     hlgihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: hlgílang ñasa'áa
     hlgihl+V+NEAR+FUTURE: hlgílang ñasa'áang
     hlgihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hlgílang ñasaasdláa
     hlgihl+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hlgílang ñasaasdláang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hlgílgang'waa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hlgílgang'waang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: hlgílgang'waa.ang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hlgílgang'anggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: hlgílgang'angang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: hlgílang ñasaa'áng
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: hlgílang ñasaa'ánggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hlgílang ñasaasdlä'áng
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hlgílang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hlgílgang'ang'waa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hlgílgang'ang'waang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: hlgílgang'ang'waa.ang
